test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kachchuo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kaččuo: # Verb 'to watch / katsoa' - full paradigm
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kačon
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kačot
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaččou
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kačommo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kačotto
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kačotah
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kačo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3: kačota
 
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kačoin
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kačoit
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaččoi
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kačoimmo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kačoitto
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kačottih
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kaččonuh
      kaččuo+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3: kačottu
      
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg1:  kaččozin
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg2:  kaččozit
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Sg3:  kaččos
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl1:  kaččozimmo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl2:  kaččozitto
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prs+Pl3:  kačottas
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kaččos
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3:  kačottas

      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg1:  kaččonuzin
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg2:  kaččonuzit
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Sg3:  kaččonus
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl1:  kaččonuzimmo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl2:  kaččonuzitto
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prt+Pl3:  kačotannus
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: kaččonus
      kaččuo+V+Act+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3:  kačotannus

      kaččuo+V+Act+Pot+Sg1:  kaččonen
      kaččuo+V+Act+Pot+Sg2:  kaččonet
      kaččuo+V+Act+Pot+Sg3:  kaččonou
      kaččuo+V+Act+Pot+Pl1:  kaččonemmo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Pot+Pl2:  kaččonetto
      kaččuo+V+Act+Pot+Pl3:  kačotanneh
      kaččuo+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg: kaččone
      kaččuo+V+Act+Pot+ConNeg+Pl3:  kačotanne

      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2:  kačo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+Sg3:  kaččokkah
      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+Pl1:  kaččokkuammo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: [kaččokkua, kaččokkuatto]
      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+Pl3:  kačottahes
      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kačo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg3: kaččokkah
      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl1: kaččokkuammo
      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: kaččokkua
      kaččuo+V+Act+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl3: kačottahes

      kaččuo+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kaččoi
      kaččuo+V+Act+PrfPrc: kaččonuh
      kaččuo+V+Pss+PrsPrc: kačottavu
      kaččuo+V+Pss+PrfPrc: kačottu
      kaččuo+V+Inf: kaččuo
 
 
